Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.180

Conditional release—Periodic review of case.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

Each person conditionally released pursuant to RCW 10.77.150 shall have his or her case reviewed by the court which conditionally released him or her no later than one year after such release and no later than every two years thereafter, such time to be scheduled by the court. Review may occur in a shorter time or more frequently, if the court, in its discretion, on its own motion, or on motion of the person, the secretary of social and health services, the secretary of corrections, medical or mental health practitioner, or the prosecuting attorney, so determines. The sole question to be determined by the court is whether the person shall continue to be conditionally released. The court in making its determination shall be aided by the periodic reports filed pursuant to RCW 10.77.140 and 10.77.160, and the opinions of the secretary and other experts or professional persons. If the conditionally released person is indigent, and so requests, the court shall assist the person in obtaining a qualified expert or professional person to examine the person on his or her behalf. An expert or professional person obtained by a conditionally released indigent person who was committed to state psychiatric care following acquittal by reason of insanity shall be compensated out of funds of the office of public defense as provided in policies and procedures under chapter 2.70 RCW, in a manner consistent with the rules of professional conduct and the standards for indigent defense.

[ 2023 c 120 s 10; 1998 c 297 s 42; 1993 c 31 s 9; 1974 ex.s. c 198 s 14; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 18.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2023 c 120: See notes following RCW 2.70.027.

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.